Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1215
Department; authority granted for specialized services; social services; duties.

The department shall carry out the authority granted to it pursuant to section 68-1204 and shall comply with all applicable provisions of the federal act identified in such section and of sections 68-1202 to 68-1210.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 15;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 974.